Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 5

Judicial Procedures Generally

33-3-501. Patient or resident not released during pendency of proceedings — Exceptions.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title, no person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability with respect to whom proceedings for hospitalization or admission under a court order have been commenced, shall be released or discharged during the pendency of the proceedings, unless ordered by the court upon application of the person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability or of the parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, conservator, spouse or adult next of kin of the person, or upon the report of the chief officer that the person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability may be discharged with safety.

This provision does not limit the duties to release persons with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability imposed by §§ 33-5-302, 33-5-303, and 33-6-207, and chapter 6, parts 3, 4, and 8 of this title.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 7; 1974, ch. 802, § 23; 1978, ch. 533, § 5; 1983, ch. 323, § 12; T.C.A., § 33-310; Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 11; 1996, ch. 1079, § 52; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 33-3-101 — 33-3-112, 33-3-201 — 33-3-203, 33-3-301 — 33-3-303, 33-3-401 — 33-3-412, 33-3-501 — 504, 33-3-601 — 33-3-603, 33-3-605 — 33-3-19, 33-3-623, 33-3-701 — 33-3-711, 33-3-801, 33-3-901 — 33-3-908 (Acts 1955, ch. 187, § 1; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 4-7, 16-19, 23-26; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 17-20, 22-25, 29-32; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 5-7, 11; 1976, ch. 489, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 763, §§ 1, 2, 10; 1977, ch. 482, § 11; 1978, ch. 533, §§ 3-5; 1978, ch. 533, § 7; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 366, § 15; 1980, ch. 838, § 5; 1983, ch. 323, § 4-7, 9, 12, 15, 16; T.C.A. §§ 33-303 — 33-307, 33-309 — 33-312, 33-317 — 33-320, 33-330 — 33-337, 33-345 — 33-347, 33-355, 33-360 — 33-362, 33-364 — 33-378, 33-382, 33-610, 33-1101; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 2-5, 7, 16-23, 34; 1984, ch. 986, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 6-13, 33; 1986, ch. 570, §§ 2-4; 1986, ch. 836, § 3, 5; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 2, 3, 7; 1988, ch. 828, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, §§ 30-33; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 2, 5-13; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 29-31, 113; 1992, ch. 991, § 13; 1993, ch. 66, § 44; 1993, ch. 439, § 1; 1993, ch. 356, § 4; 1994, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 743, § 1; 1995, ch. 320, § 1; 1995, ch. 411, § 1; 1996, ch. 669, § 1; 1996, ch. 675, § 15; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 31-47, 49-56; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-3-304 (Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 20; T.C.A., § 33-702), which was previously repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-604 (Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 9; T.C.A., § 33-363), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-620, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(e) and (f) in 1984; § 33-3-621, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(g) in 1984; and § 33-3-622, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(h) in 1984, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, § 3.

Collateral References.

Liability of one releasing institutionalized mental patient for harm he causes. 38 A.L.R.3d 699.

33-3-502. Record of proceedings — Copy of court order with recipient's history to hospital or developmental center.

In all judicial proceedings under this title the clerk of the court in which the proceedings are held shall keep a careful and accurate record of the proceedings.

Whenever, in a judicial proceeding under this title, a person has been ordered hospitalized or admitted, the clerk of the court shall immediately communicate the action of the court to the chief officer of the hospital or developmental center.

A copy of the court order shall be forwarded to the hospital or developmental center, together with a personal and family history of the person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability that the clerk shall complete, and any other forms or documents required by rules of the department.

The department shall furnish a supply of all necessary forms to the clerks of the various courts.

The clerk may communicate to the chief officer of the hospital or developmental center the cost that shall be included in the costs and expenses of the case.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 16; 1974, ch. 802, § 24; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-311; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-3-503. Costs of proceedings.

The reasonable costs incurred in judicial proceedings under this title shall be paid by the subject of the proceedings or the subject's estate or by the subject's responsible relatives and shall be a charge upon the estate of those liable.

The reasonable costs incurred in judicial proceedings filed by the chief officer of a department facility to have a guardian or conservator appointed under title 34, shall be paid by the subject of the proceedings in conformity with that law.

If a subject of proceedings under this title is indigent and does not have responsible relatives able to pay the costs or if a subject of guardianship or conservatorship proceedings filed by the chief officer of a department facility is indigent under the guardianship or conservatorship law under title 34, the state shall pay the costs.

For the purpose of subdivision (c)(1), the supreme court shall prescribe by rule the nature of costs for which reimbursement may be allowed, and limitations on and conditions for reimbursement of costs as it deems appropriate in the public interest, subject to this section. The rules shall also specify the form and content of applications for reimbursement of costs to be filed under this section. The administrative director of the courts shall administer this subsection (c) and rules adopted under this subsection (c), and shall audit and review all applications for reimbursement of costs. Upon finding payment to be in order, the administrative director of the courts shall process the payment from money appropriated for that purpose.

In any case where the subject of the proceedings is judicially determined not to be involuntarily hospitalized, committed, or transferred, the costs may be taxed against the person who seeks hospitalization, commitment, or transfer of the subject of the proceedings.

The court may require any petitioner to file an undertaking with surety to be approved by the court in an amount the court considers proper to assure the payment of costs and expenses and to save harmless the respondent by reason of costs incurred, including attorney's fees, if any, and damages suffered by the respondent as a result of the action.

Witnesses subpoenaed to appear in proceedings held under this title shall be paid fees and mileage as provided by law for witnesses generally.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 17; 1974, ch. 802, § 25; 1976, ch. 763, § 2; T.C.A., § 33-312; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 3; 1985, ch. 437, § 12; 1993, ch. 66, § 44; 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2001, ch. 349, § 1.

Cross-References. Reimbursement of costs in mental health proceedings, Tenn. R. Sup. Ct. 15.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 15 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

This section is referred to in Rule 21 of the Rules of Procedure for the General Sessions Court of Knox County.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 691.

Attorney General Opinions. Legislator as court-appointed attorney, OAG 83-302, 1983 Tenn. AG LEXIS 174 (9/7/83).

Reimbursement of fees for limited guardians, OAG 84-038, 1984 Tenn. AG LEXIS 312 (1/31/84).

Fees and costs in indigent proceedings, OAG 85-021, 1985 Tenn. AG LEXIS 274 (1/29/85).

33-3-504. Physician, psychologist, or other person, as witness.

A physician, psychologist, person designated by the commissioner under § 33-6-427(b), or other professional who makes an application or conducts an examination under this title is a competent and compellable witness at any judicial proceeding conducted under it.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 15; T.C.A., § 33-355; Acts 1993, ch. 356, § 4; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-505. Use of audio visual technology in judicial proceeding.

Any judicial proceeding under this title may be conducted by the use of audio visual technology as set out in this section.

For proceedings under chapter 6, part 4 of this title, the use of audio visual technology is permissible at the court's discretion, but the court may grant any reasonable request by counsel, a party, or a guardian ad litem to conduct the proceedings in the physical presence of the court.

For any other proceedings under this title, the use of audio visual technology is permissible with the agreement of all parties and at the court's discretion.

Subject to the availability of suitable equipment and notwithstanding any law to the contrary, proceedings may be conducted through two-way electronic audio-video communication without the physical presence of the defendant, plaintiff, witnesses or attorneys before the court. Any such hearing must be conducted so that:

The defendant, plaintiff, and judge can see and hear each other throughout the entire hearing, except for the private communications excluded under subdivision (b)(5);

The judge, defendant, plaintiff and their attorneys can see and hear all witnesses while they testify orally during the hearing;

The judge, defendant, plaintiff and their attorneys can hear all questions asked of witnesses during their testimony;

The judge, defendant, plaintiff and their attorneys can hear all questions, statements, objections, motions and arguments of any attorney or party participating in the hearing; and

The defendant and defendant's attorney and plaintiff and plaintiff's attorney can communicate privately with each other during the hearing.

Acts 2004, ch. 929, § 1.

33-3-506. Delivery of pleadings and certificates of need for care and treatment by telefax transmission.

Pleadings and any certificates of need for care and treatment that must be filed in proceedings under this chapter, and chapters 5-8 of this title may be delivered to the court by telefax transmission in conformity with the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure.

Acts 2004, ch. 929, § 1.

Cross-References. Facsimile filing of pleadings, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 5A.

Electronic filing, signing or verification, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 5B.